District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1760

Effect of criminal conviction upon license application.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 23, 30 DCR 390
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(x), 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 45-1942.

Prior Codifications

Delegation of authority under Law 4-209, see Mayor’s Order 83-123, May 6, 1983.

Delegation of Authority